Maryland, session 2026, SB0017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–1102.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CIAA BASKETBALL TOURNAMENT” MEANS THE ANNUAL
BASKETBALL TOURNAMENT OF THE CENTRAL INTERCOLLEGIATE ATHLETIC
ASSOCIATION.
(3) (I) “RELATED EVENT” MEANS AN EVENT IN WHICH:
– 1 –

Ch. 3 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. A LICENSE HOLDER PARTICIPATES IN A
COORDINATED PROMOTION WITH A THIRD–PARTY PROMOTER TO SELL OR PROVIDE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DURING A SPECIFIED TIME; AND
2. AT LEAST 75 INDIVIDUALS ARE REASONABLY
ANTICIPATED TO PARTICIPATE.
(II) “RELATED EVENT” INCLUDES AN EVENT FOR WHICH
TICKETS ARE SOLD TO THE PUBLIC, EITHER IN ADVANCE OR AT THE DOOR, OR A
COVER CHARGE IS IMPOSED, INCLUDING A CONCERT, AN ENTERTAINMENT EVENT, A
HAPPY HOUR, OR A PARTY.
(4) “RELATED EVENT PROMOTER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL, A
FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION, OR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT PROMOTES A
SOCIAL EVENT RELATED TO THE CIAA BASKETBALL TOURNAMENT AROUND THE
SAME TIME AND LOCATION AS THE CIAA BASKETBALL TOURNAMENT.
(B) THERE IS A RELATED EVENT PROMOTER’S PERMIT.
(C) (1) A RELATED EVENT PROMOTER OR PARTICIPATING LICENSE
HOLDER ON BEHALF OF A RELATED EVENT PROMOTER SHALL APPLY FOR A PERMIT
FROM THE BOARD BEFORE THE RELATED EVENT PROMOTER MAY PUBLICIZE, SELL
TICKETS FOR, ORGANIZE, OPERATE, PRODUCE, OR STAGE A RELATED EVENT.
(2) A HOLDER OF A STATE CATERER’S LICENSE SHALL OBTAIN A
CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, BEER AND WINE, OR BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
FROM THE BOARD BEFORE THE HOLDER MAY ACT AS A PARTICIPATING LICENSE
HOLDER AT A RELATED EVENT.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE BOARD MAY GRANT THE PERMIT TO AN APPLICANT WHO SUBMITS AN
APPLICATION TO THE BOARD AS PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE AT
LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE RELATED EVENT.
(2) BEFORE BEING GRANTED THE PERMIT, AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(I) OBTAIN WRITTEN CONSENT FROM A DESIGNEE OF VISIT
BALTIMORE;
(II) IF REQUIRED BASED ON THE TYPE OF PREMISES TO BE
USED:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 3
1. OBTAIN A SPECIAL EVENT PERMIT FROM THE
BALTIMORE CITY DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION; AND
2. PROVIDE A COPY OF THE SPECIAL EVENT PERMIT TO
THE BOARD; AND
(III) PROVIDE A COMPLETED APPLICATION THAT:
1. IS DATED AND NOTARIZED, AND SIGNED BY EACH
LICENSE HOLDER THAT WILL PARTICIPATE IN THE RELATED EVENT;
2. LISTS EACH PREMISES FOR WHICH THE RELATED
EVENT WILL BE HELD; AND
3. IS ACCOMPANIED BY ANY OTHER DOCUMENT THAT
THE BOARD REQUIRES.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPLIES FOR AND IS ISSUED THE PERMIT IS
NOT REQUIRED TO BE A RESIDENT OF OR REGISTERED TO VOTE IN BALTIMORE
CITY.
(4) WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING AN APPLICATION, THE BOARD
SHALL GRANT OR DENY THE PERMIT OR REQUEST MORE INFORMATION FROM THE
APPLICANT.
(5) A PERMIT MAY NOT BE ALTERED WITHIN 14 DAYS BEFORE THE
RELATED EVENT IS SCHEDULED TO TAKE PLACE.
(E) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE RELATED EVENT PROMOTER AND
PARTICIPATING LICENSE HOLDER TO CONDUCT A RELATED EVENT.
(F) THE PERMIT FOR EACH RELATED EVENT MAY BE IN EFFECT FOR THE
TIME STATED ON THE SPECIAL EVENT PERMIT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(1) CONDUCTING A RELATED EVENT, INCLUDING HEALTH AND
SAFETY STANDARDS TO BE MET BY THE RELATED EVENT PROMOTER AND
PARTICIPATING LICENSE HOLDER; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 3 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) PROVIDING PUBLIC NOTICE OF A RELATED EVENT AT THE
PREMISES OF PARTICIPATING LICENSE HOLDERS BY THE RELATED EVENT
PROMOTER OR PARTICIPATING LICENSE HOLDERS.
(H) (1) THE APPLICATION FEE IS $50, PAYABLE ON THE SUBMISSION OF
THE APPLICATION.
(2) THE PERMIT FEE, PAYABLE WHEN THE PERMIT IS GRANTED, IS:
(I) $500, IF THE BALTIMORE CITY FIRE MARSHAL HAS
DETERMINED THAT THE MAXIMUM CAPACITY FOR THE PROPOSED LOCATION IS LESS
THAN 300 PERSONS; OR
(II) $1,500, IF THE BALTIMORE CITY FIRE MARSHAL HAS
DETERMINED THAT THE MAXIMUM CAPACITY FOR THE PROPOSED LOCATION IS 300
OR MORE PERSONS.
12–2802.
(E) (1) FOR THE OFFENSE OF PUBLICIZING, SELLING TICKETS OR
IMPOSING A COVER CHARGE FOR, ORGANIZING, OPERATING, PRODUCING,
FACILITATING, OR STAGING A RELATED EVENT WITH THE KNOWLEDGE OR A REASON
TO KNOW THAT A RELATED EVENT PROMOTER’S PERMIT REQUIRED UNDER §
12–1102.2 OF THIS TITLE HAS NOT BEEN OBTAINED, THE BOARD SHALL IMPOSE A
FINE OF NOT LESS THAN $1,000 AND NOT MORE THAN $3,000 OR SUSPEND THE
LICENSE OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES § 12–1102.2 OF THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE
GRANTED A RELATED EVENT PROMOTER’S PERMIT FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR.
(F) FOR THE OFFENSE BY A HOLDER OF A STATE CATERER’S LICENSE OF
PARTICIPATING IN A CIAA BASKETBALL TOURNAMENT RELATED EVENT WITHOUT
FIRST OBTAINING A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, BEER AND WINE, OR BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE REQUIRED UNDER § 12–1102.2 OF THIS TITLE, THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR SHALL IMPOSE A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN $1,000 AND NOT MORE THAN
$3,000 OR SUSPEND THE STATE CATERER’S LICENSE OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. It shall remain effective through June 30, 2029, and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 3
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, February 24, 2026.
– 5 –